Utah statutes.
78A-6-311.   Adjudication -- Dispositional hearing -- Time deadlines.

(1)  If, at the adjudication hearing, the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that the allegations contained in the petition are true, it shall conduct a dispositional hearing.

(2)  The dispositional hearing may be held on the same date as the adjudication hearing, but shall be held no later than 30 calendar days after the date of the adjudication hearing.

(3)  At the adjudication hearing or the dispositional hearing the court shall schedule dates and times for:

(a)  the six-month periodic review; and

(b)  the permanency hearing.

